Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201081-8,270
Director; employ personnel.

The director may employ any subordinate personnel necessary to assist
him or her in the performance of his or her duties, including clerical staff
and technical advisors. The director may employ assistant directors if necessary
to develop, assist, and cooperate with local commissions on Latino-Americans.

Laws 1972, LB 1081, § 9;

Laws 1980, LB 923, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB139, § 3.